src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!! --------------------
!! Nenets ?? adjectives compare.

LEXICON A_UNDECL
+A: # ;

!!LEXICON Comparisons
!!+A+pos:0        Cases   ;
!!+A+cmp:er       Cases   ;
!!+A+sup:est      Cases   ;

LEXICON A_ӇЭ !!= @CODE@ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  
+A:  SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON A_ПАНЫ  !!= @CODE@ пӑны:пӑны 9 
+A:  SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ПАНЫ ;

LEXICON A_ХУСУВЭЙ  !!= @CODE@ хусувэй: 10 !!ProsSg -ювна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ ;

LEXICON A_ХАНО  !!= @CODE@ хӑн: 11 !!ProsSg -увна
!! [total=27]
!! хӑн xən°    хӑнӑн’ xənən°h        хӑн” xən°q     хӑно xəno
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ХАНО ;

LEXICON A_ЕД !!= @CODE@ ед: 13 !!ProsSg -увна /-ювна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ЕД ;

LEXICON A_ӇУДИ  !!= @CODE@ ӈуда: 15 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇУДИ ;

LEXICON A_ӇОДИ  !!= @CODE@ ӈодя: 17 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇОДИ ;

LEXICON A_ӇОДИ/ТЁН
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ӇОДИ/ТЁН ;

LEXICON A_МАРАӇГЫ !!
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_МАРАӇГЫ ;

LEXICON A_ХОБ  !!= @CODE@ хоба: 19 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ХОБ ;

LEXICON A_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ !!
!!
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ ;

LEXICON A_ТЁН  !!= @CODE@ тёня: 20 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ТЁН ;

LEXICON A_ПИСЬ  !!= @CODE@ пися: 21 !!ProsSg -вна
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_ПИСЬ ;

LEXICON A_ӇАНУ  !!= @CODE@ ӈӑно: 23 !!ProsSg -вна
!! [total=57]
!! ңӑно ŋəno   ңӑнон’ ŋənon°h ңӑно” ŋənoq    ңӑну ŋənu
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇАНУ ;

LEXICON A_ӇУВО  !!= @CODE@ ӈумʼ:ӈум 25 !!ProsSg -(м)на
!! ңум’ ŋum     ңумд’ ŋumt°h    ңув” ŋuw°q      ңуво ŋuwo
+A:ʼ SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇУВО ;


LEXICON A_НЮБЕ-Pal/Var  !!= @CODE@ нюмʼ:нюм 26
!! нюм’ nyum    нюмд’ nyumt°h   нюв” nyuw°q     нюбе nyubye
+A:ʼ SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_НЮБЕ ;

LEXICON A_МЕРЁ !! Check this
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ӇАНУ ;

LEXICON A_ВАР
! варˮ:вар
 A_МЯДО ;

LEXICON A_МЯДО  !!= @CODE@ мяˮ:мя 35   !!ProsSg -мна
+A:Д1 SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_МЯДО ;

LEXICON A_САБЦЬ  !!= @CODE@ сабць:сабць!!= @CODE@ тир: 12 !!ProsSg -увна
!! What makes this different from N_ТИРЕ?
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: NMN_ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON	    A_САВНЕ !!= @CODE@ 
+WORK+A: K ;



!!This has to be split into various sublexcons.
LEXICON A_Cons
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_Cons ;

!!This has to be split into various sublexcons.
LEXICON A_Vow
+A: SGNOMSUF ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_Vow ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
