src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON adjectives
вадисей:вадисей A_САБЦЬ  "vasen" ;
ваeˮ:ваeˮ A_UNDECL  "yksi (kahdesta)" ;
вомдарабэй:вомдарабэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "" ;
выӈгы:выӈгы A_ПАНЫ  "tundra-" ;
вэва:вэва A_ХОБ  "huono" ;
вэксуй:вэксуй A_ЕД  "venytetty" ;
вэнзу:вэнзу A_ӇЭ  "ilkeä" ;
вэтавы:вэтавы A_ПАНЫ  "jatkettu" ;
едабэй:едабэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "raaka" ;
едета:едета A_ӇУДИ  "sairas" ;
епика:епика A_МАРАӇГЫ  "lämmin" ;
еры:еры A_ПАНЫ  "keskimmäinen" ;
еӈгалёй:еӈгалёй A_ЕД  "pitkulainen" ;
иба:иба A_ӇУДИ  "lämmin" ;
ибцика:ибцика A_МАРАӇГЫ  "katkera" ;
ибциня:ибциня A_ӇОДИ  "hapan" ;
ибцяда:ибцяда A_ӇУДИ  "katkera" ;
идалпэй:идалпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "kuivunut" ;
илека:илека A_МАРАӇГЫ  "iloinen" ;
илека:иˮлика A_МАРАӇГЫ  "iloinen" ;
иленя:иленя A_ӇОДИ  "asuva" ;
илӈгы:илӈгы A_ПАНЫ  "elämän-" ;
иняний:иняняӈгы A_ПАНЫ  "vasen" ;
исяламбэй:исяламбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "hullu" ;
иӈгденя:иӈгденя A_ӇОДИ  "arvostava" ;
иӈгденя:иӈгденя A_ӇОДИ  "kunnioitettu" ;
лабахэй:лабахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "lohkaistu" ;
лабтахы:лабтахы A_ПАНЫ  "tasankolla asuva" ;
лабцехэй:лабцехэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "tarttunut" ;
лак:лак A_ХАНО  "nopea" ;
лата:лата A_ХОБ  "leveä" ;
ледарпэй:ледарпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "hyytelömäinen" ;
лимбика:лимбика A_МАРАӇГЫ  "pehmeä ja lämmin" ;
лоӈгрэця:лоӈгрэця A_ӇОДИ  "kupera" ;
лус:лус A_ЕД  "kiero" ;
лырахэй:лырахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "haljennut" ;
лэдысяда:лэдысяда A_ӇУДИ  "luurangoton" ;
лэмбарата:лэмбарата A_ӇУДИ  "leveärintainen" ;
лэри:лэри A_ӇЭ  "laiha" ;
лэсё:лэсё A_МЕРЁ  "laiska" ;
лэто:лэто A_ӇАНУ  "lihava" ;
лябта:лябта A_ӇУДИ  "leveä ja matala" ;
лядхэй:лядхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "rako" ;
лёдхэй:лёдхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "puristettu" ;
маˮламбэй:маˮламбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "kerätty" ;
мадавы:мадавы A_ПАНЫ  "leikattu" ;
мадкое:мадкое A_САВНЕ  "poloinen" ;
майхы:майхы A_ПАНЫ  "toukokuinen" ;
малебцо:малебцо A_ӇАНУ  "ruokaisa" ;
малк:малк A_ХАНО  "sarveton" ;
малкуй:малкуй A_ЕД  "sarveton" ;
малсяда:малсяда A_ӇУДИ  "loputon" ;
малхы:малы A_ПАНЫ  "pääte-" ;
мальвы:мальевы A_ПАНЫ  "rikottu" ;
манзахэй:манзахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "" ;
манорˮ:манор A_ВАР  "pikkuinen" ;
маркы:маркы A_ПАНЫ  "kaupunki-" ;
маро:маро A_ӇАНУ  "kitsas" ;
марцьхы:марцьхы A_ПАНЫ  "olka-" ;
маябцо:маябцо A_ӇАНУ  "iloinen" ;
маядярэй:маядярэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "loukattu" ;
маяндана:маяндана A_ӇУДИ  "pieni" ;
молорˮ:молор A_ВАР  "pilvinen" ;
мудёй:мудёй A_ЕД  "kostea" ;
муйха:муйха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "pykäläinen" ;
мурсей:мурсей A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "säröinen" ;
мурхэй:мурхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "säröinen" ;
мэнеялада:мэнеялада A_ӇУДИ  "lemmikki" ;
мэё:мэё A_ӇАНУ  "luja" ;
мярё:мярё A_МЕРЁ  "paperi=" ;
мяˮеӈгад:мяеӈгад A_ЕД  "kodan lähellä oleva" ;
нарэця:нарэця A_ӇОДИ  "keväinen" ;
насадарта:насадарта A_ӇУДИ  "liukas" ;
наӈгадя:наӈгадя A_ӇОДИ  "täys-" ;
наӈэдя:наӈэдя A_ӇОДИ  "täys-" ;
невхы:невхы A_ПАНЫ  "vanha" ;
невхымбэй:невхымбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "vanhentunut" ;
ненадо:ненадо A_ӇАНУ  "silmäänpistävä" ;
нензелˮ:нензел A_ВАР  "yksinkertainen" ;
нерденя:нерденя A_ӇОДИ  "edessä menevä" ;
неры:неры A_ПАНЫ  "edellinen" ;
нехэдёй:нехэдёй A_ЕД  "luisu" ;
ниня:ниня A_ӇОДИ  "ei oleva" ;
нумлаха:нумлаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "taivaallinen" ;
ныдахэй:ныдахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "halkeama" ;
нюдя:нюдя A_ӇОДИ  "pieni" ;
нюдярка:нюдярка A_МАРАӇГЫ  "pienempi" ;
нюкля:нюкля A_ӇОДИ  "iso" ;
нюнабцо:нюнабцо A_ӇАНУ  "rasittava" ;
нюта:нюта A_ӇУДИ  "lapsinen" ;
няби:няби A_ӇЭ  "toinen" ;
нядэляӈг:нядэляӈг A_ЕД  "jäkäläinen" ;
нялцарпэй:нялцарпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "hapan" ;
няльмехэй:няльмехэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "löysennetty" ;
нянзарˮ:нянзар A_ВАР  "läpimärkä" ;
нярк:нярк A_ХАНО  "punatukkainen" ;
няро:няро A_ӇАНУ  "puhdas" ;
нясана:нясана A_ӇУДИ  "yhteistyöhön sopiva" ;
паˮмя:паˮмя A_ӇОДИ  "terävä" ;
паˮнуй:паˮнуй A_ЕД  "terävä" ;
падахэй:падахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "kiristävä" ;
падвы:падвы A_ПАНЫ  "kirjava" ;
падлада:падлада A_ӇУДИ  "seisova" ;
падяраха:падяраха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "sapinvärinen" ;
пальˮ:паль A_МЯДО  "tiheä" ;
панзу:панзу A_ӇЭ  "pysymätön" ;
парахэй:парахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "poltettu" ;
пари:пари A_ӇЭ  "musta" ;
париденя:париденя A_ӇОДИ  "musta" ;
пародиˮ:пароди A_МЯДО  "ketterä" ;
партёй:партёй A_ЕД  "pähkä-" ;
парё:парё A_МЕРЁ  "huolekas" ;
пелха:пелха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "tasainen" ;
пендхэй:пендхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "räjähtetty" ;
пидехэй:пидехэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "palanut" ;
пиребэй:пиребэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "keitetty" ;
пирця:пирця A_ПИСЬ  "korkea" ;
писяӈгад:писяӈгад A_ЕД  "naurunhaluinen" ;
пихы:пихы A_ПАНЫ  "ulkona oleva" ;
поё:поё A_МЕРЁ  "tiivis" ;
поӈгы:поӈгы A_ПАНЫ  "välissä oleva" ;
пудана:пудана A_ӇУДИ  "viimeinen" ;
пуро:пуро A_ӇАНУ  "punatukkainen" ;
пусэй:пусэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "viimeinen" ;
пык:пык A_ХАНО  "ahdas" ;
пэвдя:пэвдя A_ӇОДИ  "pimeä" ;
пэдараляӈг:пэдараляӈг A_ЕД  "metsäinen" ;
пэдарасавэй:пэдарасавэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "metsäinen" ;
пярв:пярв A_ХАНО  "tosi kova" ;
саˮла:саˮла A_ӇУДИ  "tyhmä" ;
саварка:саварка A_МАРАӇГЫ  "paras" ;
салмхэй:салмхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "tasoitettu" ;
салу:салу A_ӇЭ  "laiska" ;
самнуй:самнуй A_ЕД  "lyhyt ja suippo" ;
сапхэй:сапхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "pystysuora" ;
сата:сата A_ӇУДИ  "vahva" ;
сейхы:сейхы A_ПАНЫ  "sydän-" ;
сехэця:сехэця A_ӇОДИ  "hyvä" ;
сеӈг:сеӈг A_ХАНО  "sininen" ;
сибя:сибя A_ӇОДИ  "kevyt" ;
сидёмбэй:сидёмбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "valveutunut" ;
сияк:сияк A_ЕД  "valheellinen" ;
сэрˮ:сэр A_ВАР  "valkoinen" ;
сэрако:сэрако A_ӇАНУ  "valkoinen" ;
сюнраха:сюнраха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "höyryntapainen" ;
сяˮны:сяˮны A_ПАНЫ  "jonkun aikainen" ;
сялхэй:сялхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "kiertynyt" ;
сянако:сянако A_ӇАНУ  "leikki-" ;
сянзибей:сянзибей A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "paleltunut" ;
сянэрцялаха:сянэрцялаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "šakkilaudan tapainen" ;
сяторик:сяторик A_ЕД  "pureva" ;
табраха:табраха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "hiekkainen" ;
тамнё:тамнё A_МЕРЁ  "tarkka" ;
тарконзавэй:тарконзавэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "vasikalla" ;
тасехэй:тасехэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "keltainen" ;
тасо:тасо A_ӇАНУ  "ruskea" ;
тахарув:тахарув A_ЕД  "erilainen" ;
терсана:терсана A_ӇУДИ  "sisältöön mahtuva" ;
тидю:тидю A_ӇЭ  "kateellinen" ;
тикыхы:тикыхы A_ПАНЫ  "silloinen" ;
тора:тора A_ХОБ  "matala" ;
торанэй:торанэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "lyhytkarvainen" ;
тосэй:тосэй A_ЕД  "varovainen" ;
тынха:тынха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "tylsä" ;
тыя:тыя A_ПИСЬ  "kapea" ;
тэвасавэй:тэвасавэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "hännällinen" ;
тэри:тэри A_ӇЭ  "tavallinen" ;
тэсяда:тэсяда A_ӇУДИ  "poroton" ;
тябюбцо:тябюбцо A_ӇАНУ  "ikävä" ;
тёблё:тёблё A_ӇАНУ  "tarkka" ;
тёмбя:тёмбя A_ӇОДИ  "tarkka" ;
тёмбё:тёмбё A_МЕРЁ  "tarkka" ;
хабихэй:хабихэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "nyljetty" ;
хабто:хабто A_ӇАНУ  "puhdas" ;
хавалˮ:хавал A_ВАР  "laimea" ;
хаделпэй:хаделпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "tuuhealatvainen" ;
халбуй:халбуй A_ЕД  "pitkänomainen" ;
ханзо:ханзо A_ӇАНУ  "viileä" ;
ханимбэй:ханимбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "paleltunut" ;
харбё:харбё A_МЕРЁ  "ahkera" ;
харёй:харёй A_ЕД  "kiero" ;
хасерˮ:хасер A_ВАР  "rauhallinen" ;
хаӈэця:хаӈэця A_ӇОДИ  "mielevä" ;
хорха:хорха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "vaalea" ;
хоӈгахэй:хоӈгахэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "kerroksena erottautuva" ;
хувы:хувы A_ПАНЫ  "aamuinen" ;
хырпэй:хырпэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "harmaantunut" ;
хэˮнё:хэˮнё A_МЕРЁ  "tyyni" ;
хэбидя:хэбидя A_ӇОДИ  "pyhä" ;
хэмʼ:хэм A_ӇУВО  "lyhyt" ;
юляӈг:юляӈг A_ЕД  "solmuinen" ;
юрцавэй:юрцавэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "rasvainen" ;
ябта:ябта A_ӇУДИ  "kapea" ;
ябти:ябти A_ӇЭ  "kova" ;
ялеко:ялеко A_ӇАНУ  "vaalea" ;
яникако:яникако A_ӇАНУ  "rauhallinen" ;
янпой:янпой A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "läheinen" ;
япыка:япыка A_МАРАӇГЫ  "viileä" ;
яра:яра A_ХОБ  "hiekkainen" ;
яртараха:яртараха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "surunvoittoinen" ;
яӈгэхэй:яӈгэхэй A_ЕД/ХУСУВЭЙ  "avattu" ;
ёркахы:ёркахы A_ПАНЫ  "puoliympyrän keskeellä oleva" ;
ёря:ёря A_ӇОДИ/ТЁН  "syvä" ;
ёӈота:ёӈота A_ӇУДИ  "kulmainen" ;
ӈабтена:ӈабтеня A_ӇОДИ  "hajuinen" ;
ӈадибцо:ӈадибцо A_ӇАНУ  "hyvin näkyvä" ;
ӈадибцо:ӈадябцо A_ӇАНУ  "hyvin näkyvä" ;
ӈадибцо:ӈадибцё A_МЕРЁ  "hyvin näkyvä" ;
ӈамдэˮлаха:ӈамдэˮлаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "vihreä" ;
ӈамнялада:ӈамнялада A_ӇУДИ  "makea" ;
ӈанаха:ӈанаха A_МАРАӇГЫ  "joutilas" ;
ӈарка:ӈарка A_МАРАӇГЫ/ХОБ  "iso" ;
ӈармбэй:ӈармбэй A_ХУСУВЭЙ  "iäkäs" ;
ӈаць:ӈаць A_САБЦЬ  "nuori" ;
ӈока:ӈока A_ХОБ  "runsas" ;
ӈоцько:ӈоцько A_ӇАНУ  "pikku-" ;
ӈыбкарˮ:ӈыбкар A_ВАР  "" ;
ӈынёлˮ:ӈынёл A_ВАР  "aloitekyvytön" ;
ӈырк:ӈырк A_ХАНО  "kuuliainen" ;
ӈэли:ӈэли A_ӇЭ  "toinen" ;
ӈэлири:ӈэлири A_ӇЭ  "kummallinnen" ;
ӈэрмний:ӈэрмний A_ЕД  "pohjoinen" ;
